Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1581.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 327.531 is amended to read:
327.531. (1)(a) A school or school district that meets the eligibility requirements of the special
provisions of the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program or
School Breakfast Program [may] must apply to the Department of Education to offer
reimbursable breakfasts, lunches or both at no charge and without consideration of individual el-
igibility [by applying to the Department of Education].
(b) If the school or school district is approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school
or school district must offer breakfasts, lunches or both to all students of the school or school dis-
trict at no charge to the student.
(c) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2).
(2)(a) If a school or school district does not offer reimbursable breakfasts or lunches as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the school district must [ensure] require that each school
of the school district:
(A) Offers lunch at no charge to students [from households with incomes that do not exceed 300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines].
(B) Offers breakfast at no charge to students [from households with incomes that do not exceed
300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines], if breakfast must be offered pursuant to ORS 327.535.
(b) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (3).
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a school or school district is not re-
quired to provide breakfast or lunch at no charge to students if:
(a) The Department of Education has insufficient funds to provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2) or (3). The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that describe:
[(a)] (A) The method for determining when the department has insufficient funds[;].
(B) The criteria for determining when a breakfast or lunch must still be provided at no
charge to students based on the funds that are available to provide reimbursement. When
possible, the criteria must prioritize the offering of breakfast or lunch at no charge to stu-
dents from households with incomes that do not exceed 300 percent of the federal poverty
guidelines.
[(b)] (C) The content and timing of the notice to be provided to school districts when the de-
partment determines that the department has insufficient funds[; and].
[(c)] (D) The procedures the school or school district must follow upon receiving notice of in-
sufficient funds.
(b) The school site operates on a schedule that does not include a traditional service time
for breakfast or lunch, as determined by the Department of Education based on criteria es-
tablished by the State Board of Education by rule.
(4) The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to schools and school
districts to meet the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. ORS 327.535 is amended to read:
327.535. (1) As used in this section, “eligible student” means a student who is eligible for free
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1581
or reduced price meals under the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch
Program or School Breakfast Program.
[(2) A school district may make breakfast accessible at any school site and shall make breakfast
accessible if required by this section.]
[(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a school district that provides lunch at any
school site shall make breakfast accessible as part of a breakfast program if 25 percent or more of the
students at the school site are eligible students or the school site qualifies for assistance under Chapter
I of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965.]
[(4) A school district that makes breakfast accessible as provided under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion may apply to the Department of Education for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if the
school district is financially unable to implement a breakfast program. The department may grant a
waiver to the school district for a period not to exceed two years, after which the school district must
reestablish its claim of financial hardship if the waiver is to be extended.]
[(5) If the per meal federal reimbursement for the breakfast program falls below the 1991 re-
imbursement levels, a school district may elect to discontinue the program until federal funding is re-
stored to those levels. No waiver is required for such election.]
(2) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, a school district must make
breakfast accessible at every school site.
(3) A school district is not required to make breakfast accessible at every school site if
the school district qualifies for a waiver from the Department of Education under this sub-
section. A school district may qualify for a waiver as follows:
(a) The school district may apply for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if the
school district is financially unable to implement a breakfast program. The department may
grant a waiver to the school district for a period not to exceed two years, after which the
waiver may be extended only if the school district reestablishes a claim of financial hardship.
(b) The school district may apply for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if the
school district is unable to implement a breakfast program due to reasons identified by the
State Board of Education by rule, including operating on a schedule that does not include a
traditional service time for breakfast. The waiver shall be for a period identified by the de-
partment based on criteria established by the state board, and may be extended as provided
by the criteria.
[(6)] (4) A school district that makes breakfast accessible at any school site shall make breakfast
accessible at that school site at no charge as provided by ORS 327.531 (1) or (2). The department
shall provide reimbursement to the school district for each breakfast provided at no charge as pro-
vided by ORS 327.545.
[(7)(a)] (5)(a) Except as provided by [subsection (8) of this section] paragraph (b) of this sub-
section, a school district that makes breakfast accessible at a school site [may choose to make
breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day.] must ensure that
breakfast is accessible to all students after the beginning of the school day, regardless of
grade or arrival time.
(b) If a school district can demonstrate that 70 percent or more of the students at a
school site who regularly receive lunch at the school site also regularly receive breakfast at
the school site without the school district complying with paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the school district is not required to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(b)] (6) Time spent by students consuming breakfast is considered instructional time when stu-
[3]

A-Eng. SB 1581
dents consume breakfast in the students’ classroom and instruction is being provided while students
are consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may be considered instructional time when stu-
dents are consuming breakfast.
[(8)(a) If 70 percent or more of the students at a school site are eligible students, the school district
must make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day.]
[(b) A school district that is required to make breakfast accessible as prescribed by paragraph (a)
of this subsection must ensure that breakfast is:]
[(A) Accessible to all students after the beginning of the school day, regardless of grade or arrival
time; and]
[(B) Provided at no charge to all students, regardless of whether a student is an eligible student.]
[(c)] (7) The department shall provide technical assistance to school districts to meet the re-
quirements of this [subsection] section. Technical assistance:
(a) Must include assisting school districts in maximizing to the greatest extent practi-
cable the amounts received for reimbursement under federal law.
(b) May include the development of breakfast delivery models.
[(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, If a school district can demonstrate that 70
percent or more of the eligible students at a school site regularly receive breakfast at the school site
without the school district complying with paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district is not
required to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection.]
[(9)(a)] (8)(a) The department may award grants or enter into contracts to enable school dis-
tricts to make breakfast accessible as required under [subsection (8) of] this section. Each grant or
contract may not exceed $5,000 per school site and must be used to purchase or upgrade necessary
equipment required to provide breakfast after the beginning of the school day.
(b) The department may enter into a contract with a public or private entity for the purposes
of the entity providing:
(A) Technical assistance to applicants for and recipients of grants; and
(B) Administration of the grant program.
[(10)] (9) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 3. ORS 327.545 is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For school districts with schools that provide [United States Department of Agricul-
ture reimbursable] meals to students as described in ORS 327.531 and 327.535, the Department of
Education shall reimburse the school districts for costs incurred by the school districts [in providing
the meals. The amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts prescribed by subsections
(2) and (3) of this section] as provided by this section.
(2) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all students of the
school without consideration of individual eligibility for free or reduced price meals as described in
ORS 327.531 (1), the amount of reimbursements provided under this section [may not exceed] shall
equal the difference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(3) For schools that offer [reimbursable] breakfast and lunch at no charge to students [from
households with incomes that do not exceed 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines] as described
in ORS 327.531 (2), the amount of reimbursements provided under this section [may not exceed] shall
[4]

A-Eng. SB 1581
equal the difference between:
(a) Any amounts available as the free reimbursement rate established by the United States
Department of Agriculture for reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for making reimbursements
under this section.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 327.531, 327.535 and 327.545 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2026 Act first apply to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 5. ORS 327.537 is amended to read:
327.537. (1) A school district that makes meals accessible to students at school sites under ORS
327.531 or 327.535 or under the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch
Program or School Breakfast Program:
(a) Must provide a [United States Department of Agriculture reimbursable] meal to a student who
requests the meal:
(A) Unless the student’s parent or guardian has provided written permission to the school dis-
trict to withhold a meal from the student; and
(B) Regardless of whether the student has money to pay for the meal or owes money for meals;
and
(b) May not require that a student throw away a meal after the meal has been served because
of the student’s inability to pay for the meal or because money is owed for meals.
(2) If a student owes money for five or more meals, a school district shall:
(a) Determine if the student has been identified as being categorically eligible for free school
meals and can be directly certified without application;
(b) If the student has not been identified as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, make
at least two attempts to contact the student’s parent or guardian to have the parent or guardian fill
out an application to determine if the student is eligible for free or reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines; and
(c) If the student is not eligible or the parent or guardian does not fill out an application as
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, make reasonable efforts to contact the parent or
guardian and to offer assistance filling out an application, if appropriate.
(3) A school district may not:
(a) Publicly identify or stigmatize a student who cannot pay for a meal or who owes money for
a meal by requiring that the student wear a wristband, hand stamp or other identifying marker or
by serving the student an alternative meal; or
(b) Require a student who cannot pay for a meal or who owes money for a meal to do chores
or other work to pay for meals, unless all other students do similar chores or work regardless of
whether money is owed for meals.
(4)(a) A school district shall direct communications about amounts owed by a student for meals
to the student’s parent or guardian and not to the student.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school district from sending home a letter with a
student addressed to the parent or guardian of the student.
(5) A school district may not require a parent or guardian to pay fees or costs from collection
agencies hired to collect moneys owed for meals.
SECTION 6. This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.

[5]